Georgia statutes. TITLE 27 Game And Fish
Article 7 Feeding of Wild Alligators

27-3-170.
Feeding of wild alligators prohibited; criminal penalty.

It shall be unlawful for any person to willfully feed or bait any wild alligator not in captivity. For purposes of this Code section, willfully tossing any food item edible by alligators to or in the vicinity of a live alligator or willfully leaving any such item in or near the water where an alligator is known to frequent shall constitute willfully feeding or baiting a live alligator.

Violation of this Code section shall constitute a misdemeanor and upon conviction a violator shall be punished by a fine not to exceed $200.00 or confinement for not over 30 days, or both.

History.

Code 1981, §

27-3-170

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 467, § 1.